Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3110
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-3110 to 81-3124 and
81-3133.01 to 81-3133.03 shall be known and may be cited as the
Health and Human Services Act.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB974, § 11.